Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.070

Personnel.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the assistant directors, not to exceed two, and an internal auditor shall also be exempt from the application of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW.

The officers and exempt personnel appointed by the director pursuant to this section shall be paid salaries fixed by the governor in accordance with the procedure established by law for fixing salaries for officers exempt from the operation of the state civil service law.

All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW and engaged in duties pertaining to the functions transferred by this chapter shall be assigned to the department to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing the state merit system.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 9.]